Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.20.364

1939 conveyance of shorelands to university—Grant for arboretum and botanical garden purposes—Reversion for unauthorized use—Reconveyance for highway purposes.

All of the shorelands described in RCW 28B.20.360 are hereby granted to the University of Washington to be used for arboretum and botanical garden purposes and for no other purposes. In case the said University of Washington should attempt to use or permit the use of said shorelands or any portion thereof for any other purpose, the same shall forthwith revert to the state of Washington without suit, action or any proceedings whatsoever or the judgment of any court forfeiting the same: PROVIDED, That the board of regents of the University of Washington is hereby authorized and directed to reconvey to the state of Washington blocks 16 and 17 of Lake Washington shorelands, or such portions thereof as may be required by the state of Washington or any agency thereof for state highway purposes. The state of Washington or any agency thereof requiring said land shall pay to the University of Washington the fair market value thereof and such moneys paid shall be used solely for arboretum purposes. Such reconveyance shall be made at such time as the state or such agency has agreed to pay the same.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.20.364. Prior: 1959 c 164 s 1; 1939 c 60 s 3; No RRS. Formerly RCW 28.77.337.]